Massachusetts, session 194th, S2462.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 115 of the General Laws, appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 9 the following section:-
SECTION 9A. The commission of veteran’s service shall furnish upon request
headstones for deceased members of the Massachusetts National Guard who served 10 years or
more or for those who have perished while performing their duties while in service of the
Massachusetts National Guard. Such headstones shall be similar to those furnished by the U.S.
Department of Veterans Affairs.
of 1